Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Amusement Rides and Attractions

247.232.
Definitions for KRS 247.232 to 247.236.

As used in KRS

247.232

to

247.236

:

“Amusement ride or attraction” means:

Any mechanized device or combination of devices which carry passengers along, around, or over a fixed or restricted course for the purpose of giving its passengers amusement, pleasure, thrills, or excitement; or

Any building or structure around, over, or through which people may walk, climb, slide, jump, or move that provides amusement, pleasure, thrills, or excitement.

Unless designated by administrative regulation promulgated by the department, “amusement ride or attraction” does not include:

Coin-operated amusement devices;

Devices regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration, the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet, or the federal railroad commission;

Vessels under the jurisdiction of the United States Coast Guard or the Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources;

Tractor pulls;

Auto or motorcycle events;

Horse shows, rodeos, and other animal shows;

Games and concessions; or

Nonmechanical playground equipment, such as swings, seesaws, slides less than fifteen (15) feet in height at their highest point, rider-propelled merry-go-rounds, stationary spring-mounted animal devices, and physical fitness equipment.

The department may, by administrative regulation, designate other rides and attractions that are not included in the definition of “amusement ride or attraction”;

“ASTM Standard” means the latest standards and specifications as set forth by the American Society for Testing and Materials;

“Department ” means the Kentucky Department of Agriculture;

“Operator” means a person sixteen (16) years of age or older who has been properly trained to operate amusement rides and attractions, has knowledge of the manufacturer’s recommendations for the operation of the rides and attractions, and knows the safety-based limitations of the rides and attractions; and

“Owner” means any person or authorized agent of the person who owns an amusement ride or attraction or, in the event the ride or attraction is leased, the lessee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 386, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 356, § 1, effective April 9, 1986; 1998, ch. 23, § 15, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 417, § 10, effective December 1, 2000; 2002, ch. 268, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 28, § 1, effective March 10, 2003; 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVI, § 1, effective January 1, 2007; 2008, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 94, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 80, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/27/2019). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has changed the internal numbering of this statute to place definitions in alphabetical order. No words were changed in this process.

247.233.
Occurrence involving amusement ride or attraction resulting in death, certain injuries, or damage affecting future safe operation — Investigation — Administrative violations and civil penalties.

The owner of any amusement ride or attraction shall, within twelve (12) hours, notify the department of any occurrence involving an amusement ride or attraction if the occurrence results in:

Death;

Injury to a person, where:

The owner knows or reasonably should know that the injury was caused by the amusement ride or attraction; and

The owner knows or reasonably should know that the injury required medical treatment other than first aid; or

Damage to an amusement ride or attraction that affects the future safe operation of the ride or attraction. Reporting is not required in the case of normal wear and tear.

The department shall, after notification of an occurrence described in subsection (1) of this section, make a complete and thorough investigation of the occurrence. The report of the investigation shall be placed on file in the department and shall give in detail all facts and information available. The owner may submit results of investigations independent of the department’s investigation for inclusion in the file.

No person, following an occurrence described in subsection (1) of this section, shall:

Operate or move the amusement ride or attraction without the approval of the department, unless necessary to prevent injury to a person; or

Remove from the premises any damaged or undamaged part of the amusement ride or attraction or attempt to repair any damaged part before the department has completed its investigation. The department shall initiate its investigation within twelve (12) hours of being notified.

The department may:

Conduct hearings;

Administratively subpoena and examine under oath persons whose activities are subject to KRS

247.232

to

247.236

;

Issue administrative subpoenas and examine the business records, books, and accounts of persons whose activities are subject to KRS

247.232

to

247.236

; and

Request any other information necessary to assist the department in properly performing the department’s duties.

The department shall have control of any incident scene involving an amusement ride or attraction if there has been an occurrence described in subsection (1) of this section. The department shall remain in control of the scene until the department completes its investigation and releases the scene. The department shall have access within twelve (12) hours to all documents or records pertaining to the amusement ride or attraction.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations relating to amusement rides and attractions that establish:

A comprehensive set of administrative violations and civil penalties not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and

The procedure for the suspension or revocation of any business identification number, license, or other certificate issued by the department.

No owner of an amusement ride or attraction shall remove the amusement ride or attraction from the state before paying all civil penalties imposed under this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 116, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2015 ch. 106, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 94, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 80, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

247.234.
Business required to register — Fee — Permit required to operate — Liability insurance — Inspections — Injunction — Pre-opening inspections — Unpaid civil penalties to remain in effect and on record.

Every owner of an amusement ride or attraction business shall register the business with the department annually.

The business registration required by subsection (1) of this section shall be valid until December 31 of the calendar year in which the registration is filed and shall be issued upon payment of a registration fee, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

No amusement ride or attraction shall be operated in this state without a permit issued by the department to the owner of the amusement ride or attraction. The permit shall be kept on site during the operation of the amusement ride or attraction and viewable upon request.

A permit shall be issued to each owner to operate the permitted amusement ride or attraction in this state. A permit fee, which shall be determined by administrative regulations promulgated by the department, shall be levied for each amusement ride or attraction permit issued.

The registrant shall furnish proof of liability insurance in effect on the operation of each amusement ride or attraction providing coverage, with an insurer authorized to issue a policy in this state, in the amount of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) due to all bodily injuries or deaths per occurrence, or in lieu thereof, if the applicant’s amusement ride or amusement attraction is one that is permanently located or erected on a site in this state, the applicant shall be required only to provide proof of financial responsibility in the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000). Every insurance carrier of these policies shall notify the department at least thirty (30) days prior to cancellation of a policy for mobile amusement rides or attractions and at least ten (10) days prior to cancellation of a policy for permanent amusement rides or attractions.

In addition to proof of adequate insurance coverage, the applicant shall furnish any other information the department may require, including but not limited to written notice of each intended operating site to be received by the department at least fourteen (14) days prior to operation at that site. In cases of emergency, notice of a change in future plans may be given to the department by telephone.

The department shall require an inspection of each amusement ride or attraction before it may be operated in this state. Inspections performed by department employees shall be subject to a fee based on the complexity of the amusement ride or attraction and shall not be less than ten dollars ($10) or more than five hundred dollars ($500). The cost of all inspections performed by department employees shall be paid by the owner of the amusement ride or attraction and may be prepaid, but shall be paid no later than the day of the inspection. The department shall designate persons qualified by education or experience, who are capable of determining amusement safety in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated under KRS

247.232

to

247.236

, as amusement safety inspectors. Any person who is not an employee of the department and who is designated as an amusement safety inspector shall register with the department and pay an annual registration fee, which shall be determined by administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

A Kentucky permit seal shall be affixed to every individual amusement ride or attraction, or other location as determined by the department, before it may be operated in this state.

In addition to the inspection required in subsection (3)(e) of this section, the department may inspect amusement rides and attractions without notice at any time while operating in this state. There shall not be any charge for additional inspections in which safety violations are not found. In regard to situations in which safety violations are found, the department may charge an inspection fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for any future inspection necessary. The corrections of these safety violations shall comply with accepted standards of safety, and shall be accomplished prior to operating the equipment in this state.

In regard to situations in which safety violations are found that cannot be corrected immediately, the amusement ride or attraction shall cease to operate in this state by order of the amusement safety inspector. In addition, the amusement safety inspector shall conspicuously post a public notice on or near the amusement ride or attraction. The notice shall adequately inform the public of the safety violation present.

Any owner who continues to operate an amusement ride or attraction after an order to cease operation has been issued shall have his or her business registration suspended and the amusement ride or attraction permit revoked, and may be subject to further penalties provided in KRS

247.233

. In addition, the county attorney of each county and the department are hereby authorized to seek an injunction against the owner or operator of any amusement ride or attraction being operated in violation of KRS

247.232

to

247.236

.

Revenue generated by this section and KRS

247.233

shall be used for the implementation and administration of KRS

247.232

to

247.236

; the balance, if any, shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

An owner of an amusement ride or attraction shall:

Conduct a pre-opening inspection and test of the ride or attraction prior to admitting the public each day the ride or attraction is intended to be used; and

Maintain for at least the previous twelve (12) months a signed record of the required pre-opening inspections and tests and any other pertinent information as required by the department.

The department may revoke the registration of any owner who fails to conduct the required pre-opening inspections and tests or to maintain the required reports.

All unpaid civil penalties assessed upon a person for violations of KRS

247.232

to

247.236

shall remain in effect and shall permanently remain on record with the department regardless of whether the person:

Operates amusement rides or attractions under his or her name, another name, an assumed name, or as a sole proprietorship;

Is employed by another person operating amusement rides individually, as a sole proprietorship, or as part of a partnership or corporation; or

Operates amusement rides or attractions as a member of a partnership or corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 386, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 356, § 2, effective April 9, 1986; 1988, ch. 151, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2002, ch. 268, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVI, § 2, effective January 1, 2007; 2008, ch. 116, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 5, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2022 ch. 80, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

247.235.
Temporary amusement rides and attractions — License required — Sanctions.

Every person that operates a for-profit business that provides temporary amusement rides or amusement attractions that are within the same county as, or are within a five (5) mile radius of, a public fair or exposition that is sanctioned by the Department of Agriculture and is operated by a public fair association shall, before beginning operation, pay a license fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per day of operation to the fiscal court of the county in which the temporary amusement rides or amusement attractions are located.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to temporary amusement rides or amusement attractions that:

Operate in connection with the sanctioned public fair or exposition;

Operate at a public fair or exposition that is in a contiguous county, is sanctioned by the Department of Agriculture, and is under the authority of a public fair association;

Operate under the authority of a religious or educational organization;

Operate more than thirty (30) days before or seven (7) days after the sanctioned public fair or exposition;

Are clown acts, local festivals, or amusement or entertainment shows with six (6) or fewer kiddie rides; or

Operated as a nonprofit or charitable organization in this state before March 10, 2003.

Collection and enforcement for payment of the license fee shall be the sole responsibility of the law enforcement entity acting on behalf of and at the direction of the fiscal court in which the temporary amusement rides or amusement attractions are located.

Failure to pay the license fee upon request of the law enforcement entity shall result in the cessation of operation of the amusement rides or amusement attractions by the operator.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 28, § 2, effective March 10, 2003.

247.2351.
Operation and maintenance of amusement rides and attractions — Required submission of service manuals and records — Administrative regulations.

All amusement rides and attractions shall be operated and maintained according to the most stringent specifications and recommendations of:

The manufacturer’s specifications and recommendations;

The most recent National Electrical Code and National Fire Protection Association codes and standards; or

Any other applicable state or federal laws.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations relating to the use of replacement parts for amusement rides and attractions.

Amusement ride and attraction owners shall provide the department with the most recent manuals, service bulletins, or service and inspection records upon request by a department inspector. If any of these items are not immediately available to an inspector, the inspector may issue a stop operation order or postpone the application process until the materials are made available. Any department inspector may issue a stop operation order if the inspector finds that the provisions of the manuals or service bulletins are not being followed.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations relating to amusement rides and attractions in accordance with the latest ASTM standards.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 116, § 5, effective July 15, 2008.

247.2353.
Requirements for patrons of amusement rides and attractions — Penalties — Exceptions — Display of penalties.

All patrons of amusement rides or attractions shall:

Obey all signage posted in conspicuous locations, including but not limited to warning signs, instruction signs, and directional signs pertaining to the amusement rides or attractions;

Obey all verbal instructions from amusement ride or attraction operators; and

Maintain all safety devices, including but not limited to seat belts, restraint bars, and harnesses in accordance with all instructions from operators and posted signage.

All patrons of amusement rides or attractions shall refrain from:

Engaging in any activity that may cause bodily harm or death;

Interfering in any manner with the normal operation of the amusement ride or attraction;

Disconnecting or disabling any safety device at any time unless at the express instruction of the operator;

Extending arms or legs beyond the seating area unless at the express instruction of the operator;

Throwing, dropping, or otherwise expelling any object from any amusement ride or attraction;

Embarking on or disembarking from any amusement ride or attraction except at the designated time and area or at the direction of the operator;

Unreasonably controlling the speed or direction of any amusement ride or attraction that requires a passenger to control or direct any part of the amusement ride or attraction; or

Boarding or attempting to board any amusement ride or attraction if he or she is under the influence of alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in KRS

218A.010

.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall, upon request of the owner of the amusement ride or attraction, leave the premises on which the amusement ride or attraction is located without a refund of any admission charges or entrance fees.

Any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section and does not comply with a request to leave under subsection (3) of this section shall be guilty of criminal trespass in the second degree.

Subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall not apply to any individual who, due to the following conditions, is not capable of understanding the posted rules or oral instructions:

Blind or visually impaired as defined in KRS

61.980

;

Deaf or hard of hearing as defined in KRS

61.980

; or

Developmental disability as defined in KRS

387.510

.

Any owner of an amusement ride or attraction shall conspicuously display the penalties for violations of this section near each amusement ride or attraction.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 41, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

247.236.
Operation and construction of amusement rides and attractions — Prohibitions on operation — Entrance to amusement ride or attraction may be denied.

Amusement rides and attractions shall not be operated at unsafe speeds or loaded beyond a safe capacity in accordance with the factory specifications or, in the absence of factory specifications, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

Amusement rides and attractions shall not be operated during periods of high wind, lightning, or heavy rain.

Perimeter safety barriers such as a fence or other suitable structure shall be constructed around any amusement ride or attraction that is potentially hazardous to bystanders, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

Amusement rides and attractions shall not be operated if the owner or operator knows or should know that the operation will expose the public to an unsafe condition which is likely to result in personal injury or property damage.

No person under the age of sixteen (16) shall operate an amusement ride or attraction or operate more than one (1) ride or attraction at a time. Except as provided by paragraph (c) of this subsection, an operator shall be in attendance at all times while a ride or attraction is in operation.

No person shall operate an amusement ride or attraction or knowingly permit an operator to operate an amusement ride or attraction while under the influence of alcohol or any other impairing substance.

The department may, by administrative regulation, designate certain amusement rides or attractions where the presence of an operator is not required.

The owner or operator may deny any person entrance to an amusement ride or attraction if the owner or operator has reason to believe the entry may jeopardize the safety of the person desiring entry, other riders, or any other person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 386, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2008, ch. 116, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 94, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 80, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.